en: Salty liquorice candies
fr: Bonbons à la réglisse salée
nl: Zoute drop

en: Sweet liquorice candies
nl: Zoete drop

en: Candy canes
ja: キャンディケイン, キャンディケーン

en: Root beer barrels candies
fr: Bonbons tonneaux de Root Beer

fr: Bonbons rafraîchissants
nl: Keelpastilles

en: Honey candies, Honey candy
de: Honigsüßigkeiten, Honig Süßigkeiten, Süßigkeiten mit Honig
fi: hunajamakeiset
fr: Bonbons au miel, bonbon au miel
hr: Bomboni od meda
it: Caramelle al miele
lt: Medaus saldainiai, saldainiai iš medaus
nl: Honingbonbons

en: Candy meringues, candy meringue
fr: Meringues fantaisie, meringue fantaisie

en: Gummi candies, Gelified candies, Jelly candy
ca: Caramels gelificats
de: Gummibonbons, fruchtgummi
es: Caramelos de goma
fi: Hyytelömakeiset
fr: Bonbons gélifiés, Bonbon gélifié
he: סוכריות ג׳ל, סוכריות ג'ל
hr: voćni gumeni bomboni
hu: Zselés cukorka
it: Caramelle gommose
ja: グミ
lt: Guminukai, Želė saldainiai
nl: Gelatine-snoep
pl: Żelki
pt: Gomas, balas de goma

en: Gummy crocodiles
de: Gummi Krokodile
fr: crocodiles gélifiés
hr: Gumeni krokodili
lt: Guminukai krokodilai
nl: Gummi krokodillen

en: Gummy bananas
de: Gummi Bananen
fr: bananes gélifiées
hr: Gumene banane
lt: Guminukai bananai
nl: Gummi-bananen
pl: Żelki-banany

en: Gummy strawberries
de: Gummi Erdbeeren
fr: fraises gélifiées
hr: Gumene jagode
lt: Guminukai braškės
nl: Gummi-aardbeien
pl: Żelki-truskawki

en: Gummy cola bottles
de: Gummi Colaflaschen, Gummi Colafläschchen
fi: Kolapullokarkit
fr: bouteilles de cola gélifiées
hr: Gumene boce kole
lt: Guminukai kola
nl: Gummi colaflesjes

en: Gummy bears
de: Gummibärchen, Gummibären
es: Ositos de gominola
fi: nallekarkit
fr: ours gélifiés
hr: Gumeni medvjedići
it: Orsetti gommosi
lt: Guminukai meškiukai
nl: Gummi-beertjes
pl: Żelki-misie

en: Gummy chips
fr: Frites gélifiées
hr: Gumeni čips
lt: Guminukai čipsai

en: Gummy eggs
de: Gummi Eier
fr: Œufs gélifiés
hr: Gumena jaja
lt: Guminukai kiaušiniai

en: Acid gummy candies
de: Saure Gummibonbons
fi: happamat viinikumit
fr: Bonbons acidulés gélifiés
hr: Kiseli gumeni bomboni
lt: Rūgštūs guminukai
nl: Zure gummi snoep
zh: 酸沙软糖

en: Acid gummy lassos
de: Säurehaltige Gummischleifen
es: Lazos de goma ácidos
fr: Lassos gélifiés acides
hr: Kiseli gumeni laso
it: Lacci gommosi acidi
ja: 酸味のあるグミのラッソ
lt: Rūgščios guminės lassos
nl: Zure gummi lassos
zh: 长条酸沙软糖

en: Jelly beans
de: Jelly beans
fr: Jelly beans
hr: Žele bonbona
ja: ゼリービーンズ
lt: Guminukai pupelės
nl: Jelly beans
pl: Żelki-fasolki
zh: 软心豆粒糖

en: Lollipops, Lollipop
bg: Близалки
de: Dauerlutscher
es: Piruletas
fi: Tikkukaramellit, Tikkukaramelli, Tikkarit, Tikkari
fr: Sucettes
hr: Lizalice
it: Lecca lecca, Lecca-lecca
ja: ロリポップ
lt: Ledinukai, ledinukas
nl: Lollies
pl: Lizaki, Lizak
ru: Леденец
zh: 棒棒糖

en: Hard candies, Hard candy
fi: Kovat makeiset
fr: Bonbons durs, Bonbon dur
hr: Tvrdi bomboni
it: Caramelle dure
ja: ハードキャンディ, ハードキャンディー
nl: Harde snoepen
pl: Cukierki twarde, Twarde cukierki